Massachusetts, session 194th, H3113.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 64 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in line 108, the words “eight per cent” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:
“a rate equal to the federal funds rate as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New
York as published on July 1 of the applicable fiscal year”
SECTION 2. Section 69 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out in line 5, the words “eight per cent” and inserting in place there of the
following words:
“a rate equal to the federal funds rate as published by the Federal Reserve Bank of New
York as published on July 1 of the applicable fiscal year”
of 1